Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6542
Rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Defense Efforts Workforce Act.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 19.
July 1, 2027